District of Columbia statutes.
47-2809

Barbershops and beauty parlors.

(a)

Owners or managers of barbershops, beauty parlors, beauty salons, vanity shops, or shingle shops, by whatsoever name called, where hair cutting, hair dressing, hair dyeing, manicuring, and kindred acts are practiced shall pay a license fee of $60 biennially. In addition, any person who independently leases, rents, or is otherwise authorized to occupy a barbershop chair or a beauty shop booth from the owner of any such shop or establishment shall pay a license fee of $60 biennially for each such chair or booth so leased, rented or otherwise occupied.

(b)

Any license issued pursuant to this section shall be issued as a Public Health: Public Accommodations endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of this chapter.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 624, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 10
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 552, ch. 366
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title I, § 104(d), 23 DCR 2461
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 302(a), 42 DCR 3684
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(8), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(hh)(4)(B), 50 DCR 6913

Cross References

Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-2810.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2809.
1973 Ed., § 47-2310.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (b), substituted “Public Health: Public Accommodations endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “Class A Public Health: Public Accommodations endorsement to a master business license under the master”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(hh)(4)(B) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).